Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2520
Measure submitted to voters by municipal subdivision; procedure; approval.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the executive officer and governing body of a municipal subdivision may at any time, by resolution, provide for the submission to a direct vote of the electors of any measure pending before it, passed by it, including an override of any veto, if necessary, or enacted by the electors under sections 18-2501 to 18-2538 and may provide in such resolution that such measure shall be submitted at a special election or the next regularly scheduled primary or general election. Immediately upon the passage of any such resolution for submission, the city clerk shall cause such measure to be submitted to a direct vote of the electors, at the time specified in such resolution and in the manner provided in sections 18-2501 to 18-2538 for submission of measures upon proposals and petitions filed by voters. Such matter shall become law if approved by a majority of the votes cast.

(2) The executive officer and governing body of a municipal subdivision shall not submit to a direct vote of the electors the question of whether the municipal subdivision should initiate proceedings for the condemnation of a natural gas system.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 20;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 12;

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 26.